North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 7. Legislative Services Commission.

§ 120-31.
Legislative Services Commission organization.

The Legislative Services Commission shall consist of the President pro tempore of the Senate or a Senator designated by the President Pro Tempore, four Senators appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives or a member of the House of Representatives designated by the Speaker, and four Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The President pro tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House shall serve until the selection and qualification of their respective successors as officers of the General Assembly. The initial appointive members shall be appointed after the date of ratification of this Article and each shall serve for the remainder of his elective term of office and until his successor is appointed or until he ceases to be a member of the General Assembly, whichever occurs first. A vacancy in one of the appointive positions shall be filled in the same manner that the vacated position was originally filled, and the person so appointed shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term of the person whom he succeeds. In the event the office of Speaker becomes vacated, the four Representatives shall elect one of themselves to perform the duties of the Speaker as required by this Article. In the event the office of President pro tempore becomes vacated, the four Senators shall elect one of themselves to perform the duties of President pro tempore as required by this Article. Members so elevated shall perform the duties required by this Article until a Speaker or a President pro tempore is duly elected by the appropriate house.

The President pro tempore of the Senate or his designee from the Commission membership shall be the chairman of the Commission in odd-numbered years and the Speaker of the House of Representatives or his designee from the Commission membership shall be chairman of the Commission in even-numbered years.

The Commission may elect from its membership such other officers as it deems appropriate, and may appoint other members of the General Assembly to serve on any committee of the Commission.

(c1)

Six members of the Commission constitute a quorum.

The Commission may adopt rules governing its own organization and proceedings.

Members of the Commission, when the General Assembly is not in session, shall be reimbursed for subsistence and travel allowance as provided for members of the General Assembly when in session for such days as they are engaged in the performance of their duties.

In any case where any provision of law or any rule of the Legislative Services Commission requires approval of any action by the Legislative Services Commission, approval of that action by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and by the Speaker of the House of Representatives constitutes approval of the Commission.

History.

1969, c. 1184, s. 1; 1971, c. 1116, ss. 1-3; 1999-431, s. 3.6(a); 2011-291, s. 1.1(a); 2014-115, s. 53(a), (b).

Cross References.

As to authorization for the Legislative Services Commission and the Administrative Office of the Courts to establish safety and health programs for their employees, see

G.S. 143-589

.

§ 120-32.
Commission duties.

The Legislative Services Commission is authorized to:

Determine the number, titles, classification, functions, compensation, and other conditions of employment of the joint legislative service employees of the General Assembly, including but not limited to the following departments:

Legislative Services Officer and personnel.

Electronic document writing system.

Proofreaders.

Legislative printing.

Enrolling clerk and personnel.

Library.

Research and bill drafting.

Printed bills.

Disbursing and supply.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Temporary employees of the General Assembly are exempt from the provisions of

G.S. 135-3(8)

c., as to compensation earned in that status.

Determine the classification and compensation of employees of the respective houses other than staff elected officers; however, the hiring of employees of each house and their duties shall be prescribed by the rules and administrative regulations of the respective house;

(2a)

Obtain a criminal history record check of a prospective employee, volunteer, or contractor of the General Assembly. The criminal history record check shall be conducted by the State Bureau of Investigation as provided in

G.S. 143B-972

. The criminal history report shall be provided to the Legislative Services Officer and is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

Acquire and dispose of furnishings, furniture, equipment, and supplies required by the General Assembly, its agencies and commissions and maintain custody of same between sessions. It shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor for any person(s) to remove any state-owned furniture, fixtures, or equipment from the State Legislative Building for any purpose whatsoever, except as approved by the Legislative Services Commission;

Contract for services required for the operation of the General Assembly, its agencies, and commissions; however, any departure from established operating procedures, requiring a substantial expenditure of funds, shall be approved by appropriate resolution of the General Assembly;

Provide for engrossing and enrolling of bills,

Appoint an enrolling clerk to act under its supervision in the enrollment and ratification of acts;

Provide for the duplication and limited distribution of copies of ratified laws and joint resolutions of the General Assembly and forward such copies to the persons authorized to receive same,

Maintain such records of legislative activities and publish such documents as it may deem appropriate for the operation of the General Assembly;

Provide for the indexing and printing of the session laws of each regular, extra or special session of the General Assembly and provide for the printing of the journal of each house of the General Assembly,

Provide and supply to the Secretary of State such bound volumes of the journals and session laws and of these publications in electronic format as may be required by the Secretary of State to be distributed under the provisions of

G.S. 147-45

, 147-46.1 and 147-48.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985 (Regular Session, 1986), c. 1014, s. 40(c).

To establish a bill drafting division to draft bills at the request of members or committees of the General Assembly.

To select the locations for buildings occupied by the General Assembly, and to name any building occupied by the General Assembly.

To specify the operating and capital uses within the General Assembly budget of funds appropriated to the General Assembly which remain available for expenditure after the end of the biennial fiscal period, and to revert funds under

G.S. 143C-1-2

.

Provide insurance to provide excess indemnity for any occurrence which results in a claim against any member of the General Assembly, as provided in

G.S. 143-300.2

through

G.S. 143-300.6

. That insurance may not provide for any indemnity to be payable for any claim not covered by the above cited statutes, nor for any criminal act by a member, nor for any act committed by a member or former member prior to the inception of insurance.

Provide insurance to provide excess indemnity for any occurrence that results in a claim against any employee, officer, or committee, subcommittee, or commission member in the legislative branch other than a member of the General Assembly, as provided in

G.S. 143-300.2

through

G.S. 143-300.6

. That insurance may not provide for any indemnity to be payable for any claim not covered by the above cited statutes, nor for any criminal act, nor for any act committed prior to the inception of insurance.

History.

1969, c. 1184, s. 2; 1971, c. 685, s. 2; c. 1200, s. 8; 1977, c. 802, s. 50.60; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1191, s. 67; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 182; 1985, c. 479, s. 176(a), (b); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 40(c); 1993, c. 539, s. 912; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2001-424, s. 32.21A(a); 2001-513, s. 16(c); 2006-203, s. 59; 2007-78, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 36.13; 2020-29, s. 11; 2021-180, s. 27.2(a).

Cross References.

As to employment and supervision of members of covered person’s or legislative employee’s extended family, see G.S. 163A-220.

§ 120-32.01.
Information to be supplied.

Every State department, State agency, or State institution shall furnish the Legislative Services Office and the Legislative Analysis, Fiscal Research, and Legislative Drafting Divisions any information or records requested by them and access to any facilities and personnel requested by them. Except when accessibility is prohibited by a federal statute, federal regulation, or State statute, every State department, State agency, or State institution shall give the Legislative Services Office and these divisions access to any database or stored information maintained by computer, telecommunications, or other electronic data processing equipment, whether stored on tape, disk, or otherwise, and regardless of the medium for storage or transmission.”

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, access to the BEACON/HR payroll system by the Legislative Analysis and Legislative Drafting Divisions shall only be through the Fiscal Research Division.

Consistent with subsection (a) of this section and notwithstanding any other law relating to privacy of personnel records, the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer shall furnish the Fiscal Research Division direct online read-only access to active and retired member information or records maintained by the Retirement Systems Division in online information systems. Direct online read-only access shall not include access to medical records of individual members or to tax records and other tax-related documents of members and beneficiaries. Nothing in this subsection limits the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

For the purpose of ensuring financial transparency, accountability, and efficient operation of the Medicaid program finances by the Department of Health and Human Services, employees of the Fiscal Research Division designated by the Director of Fiscal Research shall have access to all records related to the Medicaid program. The Department of Health and Human Services shall cooperate fully with the designated employees of the Fiscal Research Division to facilitate (i) the evaluation of all financial and policy components of the Medicaid program, including financial projections, (ii) the evaluation of the budgetary construction and management of the Medicaid program, and (iii) the identification of unusual financial events. The Department shall also provide the Fiscal Research Division with electronic access to any departmental data for assessing or predicting Medicaid financial outcomes, and to any modeling software used for assessing or predicting Medicaid program financial outcomes. Employees of the Department shall not impede, delay, or restrict the provision of information or limit access to any departmental personnel necessary for the Fiscal Research Division to perform its monitoring and analysis of the Medicaid program.Nothing in this subsection grants Fiscal Research Division employees access to medical records of individuals or other information protected under the Health Information Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA).Nothing in this subsection limits the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide its annual financial projection of Medicaid program expenditures and requirements for any future fiscal years to the Chairs of the House Appropriations Committee and to the Chairs of the Senate Appropriations/Base Budget Committee no later than the date the Governor presents budget recommendations in accordance with

G.S. 143C-3-5

. Prior to providing this projection, the Secretary shall cooperatively engage designated employees of the Fiscal Research Division in ongoing bilateral analytical discussions about historical, current, and unanticipated factors that may impact projected Medicaid program financial outcomes that may affect the formulation of an official departmental annual financial projection.Nothing in this subsection limits the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 177; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8.2; 2007-78, s. 2; 2007-103, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 29.21C; 2012-142, s. 6.12; 2012-178, s. 1; 2018-142, s. 4(d); 2021-180, s. 27.2(d), (g).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-78, s. 2, effective June 14, 2007, in subsection (a), inserted “Program Evaluation” and “and access to any facilities and personnel requested by them” in the first sentence, substituted “these divisions” for “the Fiscal Research Division” and made a minor punctuation change in the second sentence; and substituted “Research, Bill Drafting, and Program Evaluation” for “Research and Bill Drafting” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2007-103, s. 1, effective June 21, 2007, added subsection (c).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 29.21C, effective July 1, 2011, rewrote subsection (b), which formerly read: “Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, access to the State Personnel Management Information System by the Research, Bill Drafting, and Program Evaluation Divisions shall only be through the Fiscal Research Division.”

Session Laws 2018-142, s. 4(d), effective December 15, 2018, substituted “Legislative Analysis” for “Research”, “Legislative Drafting” for “Bill Drafting”, and “limits” for “shall limit” throughout; in subsection (a), substituted “database” for “data base” preceding “or stored information”; and in
the second paragraph of subsection (d), substituted “grants” for “shall be construed to grant” preceding “Fiscal Research Division.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 27.2(d), (g), effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (a), deleted “Program Evaluation” following “Fiscal Research,” and in subsection (b), deleted “and access to the system by the Program Evaluation Division shall only be through the Division Director and two employees of the Division designated by the Division Director” from the end.

§ 120-32.02.
Legislative commissions’ and committees’ employees and consultants.

In the construction of a statute creating, continuing, or modifying a commission or committee whose funds are appropriated or transferred to the General Assembly or to the Legislative Services Commission for disbursement, unless that construction would be inconsistent with the manifest intent of the General Assembly or repugnant to the context of the statute, the creation, continuation, or modification of the commission or committee shall not be construed as a grant of authority to the commission or committee to hire its own employees or to contract for consultant or other services.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a commission or committee whose funds are appropriated or transferred to the General Assembly or to the Legislative Services Commission for disbursement and which has the power to contract for consultants or hire employees, or both, may contract for consultants, or hire employees, or both, only upon the prior approval of the Legislative Services Commission. A contract for employment or consultant services by such a commission or committee is void and unenforceable unless approved by the Legislative Services Commission prior to the contract being entered into.

This section shall not apply to contracts of employment or for consultant services for standing or select committees of either house of the General Assembly, or subcommittees thereof, which shall be entered into by either the Speaker of the House or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, as appropriate, and governed by the provisions of

G.S. 120-35

.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 9.1.

§ 120-32.03.
Grants and contributions to legislative commissions and committees.

In the construction of a statute creating, continuing, or modifying a commission or committee whose funds are appropriated or transferred to the General Assembly or to the Legislative Services Commission for disbursement, unless that construction would be inconsistent with the manifest intent of the General Assembly or repugnant to the context of the statute, the creation, continuation, or modification of the commission or committee shall not be construed as a grant of authority to the commission or committee to apply for, receive or accept grants, loans, and advances of non-State funds, or to receive and accept contributions from any source, of money, property, labor, or any other thing of value in order for it to conduct its work.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a commission or committee whose funds are appropriated or transferred to the General Assembly or to the Legislative Services Commission for disbursement may, only with specific approval of the Legislative Services Commission, apply for, receive, or accept grants and contributions, from any source, of money, property, labor, or any other thing of value, to be held and used for the purposes set forth in the act creating the commission or committee. Any thing of value remaining at the termination of the commission or committee shall be deposited with the Legislative Services Commission to be employed for the use of the General Assembly.

History.

1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 9.1.

§ 120-32.04.
North Carolina Youth Legislative Assembly Fund.

The North Carolina Youth Legislative Assembly Fund is created as a special and nonreverting fund. Conference registration fees, gifts, donations, or contributions to or for the North Carolina Youth Legislative Assembly (YLA) program shall be credited to the Fund.

The Fund shall be used solely to support planning and execution of the YLA program.

History.

2000-67, s. 23.1; 2004-124, s. 19.10; 2014-100, s. 30.3; 2016-94, s. 32.5(k).

§ 120-32.1.
Use and maintenance of buildings and grounds.

The Legislative Services Commission shall:

Establish policy for the use of the State legislative buildings and grounds.

Maintain and care for the State legislative buildings and grounds, but the Commission may delegate the actual work of the maintenance of those buildings and grounds to the Department of Administration, which shall perform the work as delegated.

Provide security for the State legislative buildings and grounds.

Allocate space within the State legislative buildings and grounds.

Have the exclusive authority to assign parking space in the State legislative buildings and grounds and any spaces provided in Lot 7 of the State Government Parking Complex in accordance with G.S. 143-340(18a).

The Legislative Services Officer shall have posted the rules adopted by the Legislative Services Commission under the authority of this section in a conspicuous place in the State Legislative Building and the Legislative Office Building. The Legislative Services Officer shall have filed a copy of the rules, certified by the chairman of the Legislative Services Commission, in the office of the Secretary of State and in the office of the Clerk of the Superior Court of Wake County. When so posted and filed, these rules shall constitute notice to all persons of the existence and text of the rules. Any person, whether on his own behalf or for another, or acting as an agent or representative of any person, firm, corporation, partnership or association, who knowingly violates any of the rules adopted, posted and filed under the authority of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person, firm, corporation, partnership or association who combines, confederates, conspires, aids, abets, solicits, urges, instigates, counsels, advises, encourages or procures another or others to knowingly violate any of the rules adopted, posted and filed under the authority of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may waive in writing the application of any rule adopted by the Legislative Services Commission to either or both of the House and Senate Sergeants-at-Arms of the General Assembly, and such a jointly-executed waiver shall be a defense against any prosecution for violation of such rule. Such a waiver shall extend no longer than the expiration of their then current term of office. A copy of such waiver shall be delivered to the Chief of the General Assembly Special Police.

The Legislative Services Commission may cause to be removed at the owner’s expense any vehicle parked in the State legislative buildings and grounds in violation of the rules of the Legislative Services Commission and may cause to be removed any vehicle parked in any State-owned parking space leased to an employee of the General Assembly where the vehicle is parked without the consent of the employee to whom the space is leased.

(c1)

No rule adopted under this section shall prohibit the transportation or storage of a firearm in a closed compartment or container within a person’s locked vehicle or in a locked container securely affixed to a person’s vehicle. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a legislator or legislative employee who parks a vehicle in a State-owned parking space that is leased or assigned to that legislator or legislative employee may transport a firearm to the parking space and store that firearm in the vehicle parked in the parking space, provided that: (i) the firearm is in a closed compartment or container within the legislator’s or legislative employee’s locked vehicle, or (ii) the firearm is in a locked container securely affixed to the legislator or legislative employee’s vehicle.

For the purposes of this section, the term “State legislative buildings and grounds” means:

The State Legislative Building.

(1a)

The areas between the outer walls of the State Legislative Building and the far curbline of those sections of Jones, Wilmington, Salisbury, and Lane Streets that border the land on which it is situated.

(1b)

The Legislative Office Building, which shall include the following areas:

The garden area and outer stairway.

The loading dock area bounded by the wall on the east abutting the Halifax Street Mall, the southern edge of the southernmost exit lane on Salisbury Street for the parking deck, and the Salisbury Street sidewalk.

The area between its outer wall and the near curbline of that section of Lane Street that borders the land on which it is situated.

The area bounded by its western outer wall, the extension of a line along its northern outer wall to the middle of Salisbury Street, following the middle line of Salisbury Street to the nearest point of the intersection of Lane and Salisbury Streets, and thence east to the near curbline of the Legislative Office Building at its southwestern corner.

(1c)

Any State-owned parking lot which is leased to the General Assembly.

(1d)

The bridge between the State Legislative Building and the Halifax Street Mall.

(1e)

A portion of the brick sidewalk surface area of the Halifax Street Mall, described as follows: beginning at the northeast corner of the Legislative Office Building, thence east across the brick sidewalk to the inner edge of the sidewalk adjacent to the grassy area of the Mall, thence south along the inner edge of the sidewalk to the southwest outer corner of the grassy area of the Mall, thence east along the inner edge of the sidewalk adjacent to the southern outer edge of the grassy area of the Mall to a point north of the northeast corner of the pedestrian surface of the Lane Street pedestrian bridge, thence south from that point to the northeast corner of the pedestrian surface of the bridge, thence west along the southern edge of the brick sidewalk area of the Mall to the southeast corner of the Legislative Office Building, thence north along the east wall of the Legislative Office Building, to the point of beginning.

(1f)

From the center of Lane Street to the far curbline on the south side of the street; between the western edge of the Lane Street driveway to the gardens behind the State Records Center, and Wilmington Street.

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-156, s. 1, effective September 24, 1998.

The parking spaces in the upper level of State Parking Deck 65 located under the Halifax Street Mall.

History.

1973, c. 99, s. 1; 1975, c. 145, s. 3; 1981, c. 772, ss. 3, 4; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 7(a); 1993, c. 539, s. 913; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, ss. 8(c), 8.1; 1998-156, s. 1; 2003-284, s. 19B.2; 2006-264, s. 60; 2011-63, s. 3; 2011-268, s. 25; 2017-199, s. 1.

§ 120-32.1A.
Evacuation of legislative buildings and grounds.

The Chief of the General Assembly Police, or the Chief’s designee, shall exercise at all times those means that, in the opinion of the Chief, or the Chief’s designee, may be effective in protecting the State legislative buildings and grounds and the persons within those buildings and grounds from fire, bombs, bomb threats, or any other emergency or potentially hazardous conditions, including both the ordering and control of the evacuation of those buildings and grounds. The Chief, or the Chief’s designee, may employ the assistance of other available law enforcement agencies and emergency agencies to aid and assist in evacuations of the legislative buildings and grounds.

History.

1997-112, s. 2.

§ 120-32.2.
General Assembly Special Police.

All sworn members of the General Assembly Special Police employed by the Legislative Services Office are special police officers, and have all the powers of policemen of cities, within any of the following areas of jurisdiction, while on official duty:

Within those areas of the City of Raleigh and of the unincorporated parts of Wake County surrounded by the innermost right-of-way of Interstate 440.

Throughout the State:

While accompanying a member of the General Assembly who is conducting, or traveling to or from, his or her official duties.

While preparing for, or providing security to, a session of either or both houses of the General Assembly, or official events directly related to that session.

While performing advance work for continuity of government planning and performing advance work and providing security for the protection of legislative members, staff, and the public for any meeting of a study, standing, select, or joint select committee, a caucus, or any committee or commission meeting of the General Assembly, or any state, regional, or national meetings of legislative bodies or organizations representing legislative bodies, and while accompanying a member of the General Assembly to or from any event listed in this subdivision.

While conducting a criminal investigation of a threat of physical violence against the General Assembly, a member or staff of the General Assembly, or their immediate family.

While accompanying a member of the General Assembly for the purpose of providing executive protection in response to a threat of physical violence.

While serving a subpoena issued by the General Assembly or any committee of the General Assembly authorized to issue a subpoena under the provisions of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes.

General Assembly Special Police officers may arrest persons outside the areas described in subsection (a) of this section when the person arrested has committed a criminal offense within any of the areas, for which the officer could have arrested the person within that area, and the arrest is made during such person’s immediate and continuous flight from that area.

The General Assembly Special Police officers have the exclusive authority and responsibility for enforcing the parking rules of the Legislative Services Commission.

History.

1975, c. 145, s. 1; 1981, c. 772, s. 5; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 7(b); 2005-359, s. 1; 2008-145, s. 1; 2011-63, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-359, s. 1, effective September 7, 2005, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2008-145, s. 1, effective August 2, 2008, substituted “Special Police” for “special police” throughout the section; in subsection (a), substituted “special police officers” for “special policemen”; added subdivision (a)(2)c; and in subsection (c), substituted “Special Police officers have” for “special police has.”

Session Laws 2011-63, s. 1, effective May 3, 2011, in the introductory language in subdivision (a)(2), substituted “Throughout” for “In any part of”; in subdivision (a)(2)c., inserted “for continuity of government planning,” “performing advance work and,” “a caucus,” and “committee or”; and added subdivisions (a)(2)d. through (a)(2)f.

§ 120-32.3.
Oath of General Assembly Special Police officers.

Before exercising the duties of a special police officer, each General Assembly Special Police officer shall take an oath before some officer empowered to administer oaths, and the oaths shall be filed with the Clerk of Superior Court of Wake County. The oath of office shall be as follows:

“State of North Carolina, Wake County. “I, , do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will well and truly execute the duties of General Assembly Special Police officer in the State Legislative Building and other buildings and grounds subject to the jurisdiction of the Legislative Services Commission and in other areas designated by law, according to the best of my skill and ability and according to law; and that I will use my best endeavors to enforce all rules and regulations of the Legislative Services Commission concerning use of those buildings and grounds and all laws of the State of North Carolina. So help me, God. “Sworn and subscribed to before me, this the day of , A.D. ”

Click to view

History.

1975, c. 145, s. 2; 1981, c. 772, s. 6; 2005-359, s. 2; 2008-145, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-359, s. 2, effective September 7, 2005, substituted “General Assembly” for “State Legislative Building” in the section heading; substituted “General Assembly special police officer” for “State Legislative Building security officer” in the first paragraph; and in the oath of office, inserted “General Assembly,” “and in other areas designated by law,” and “and all of the State of North Carolina” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

Session Laws 2008-145, s. 2, effective August 2, 2008, in the section catchline, substituted “Special Police officers” for “special police”; in the first paragraph, substituted “special police officer” for “special policeman” and “Special Police” for “special police”; and in the third paragraph, substituted “Special Police officer” for “special policeman.”

§ 120-32.4.
Subpoena and contempt powers.

The provisions of

G.S. 120-19.1

through 120-19.4 shall apply to the proceedings of the Legislative Services Commission as if it were a joint committee of the General Assembly.

History.

1977, c. 344, s. 5.

§ 120-32.5.
Leave for temporary employees.

Temporary part-time or full-time employees of the General Assembly who have four years of aggregate employment with the General Assembly (temporary or permanent) shall receive the same holidays, vacation leave, and sick leave as permanent part-time or full-time employees of the General Assembly respectively, or as may be determined by the Legislative Services Commission.

History.

1983, c. 923, s. 217.

§ 120-32.6.
Certain employment authority.

Use of Private Counsel. —

G.S. 114-2.3

, 143C-6-9(b), and 147-17(a) through (c1) shall not apply to the General Assembly.

General Assembly Acting on Behalf of the State of North Carolina in Certain Actions. — Whenever the validity or constitutionality of an act of the General Assembly or a provision of the Constitution of North Carolina is the subject of an action in any State or federal court, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, as agents of the State through the General Assembly, shall be necessary parties and shall be deemed to be a client of the Attorney General for purposes of that action as a matter of law and pursuant to Section 7(2) of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution. In such cases, the General Assembly shall be deemed to be the State of North Carolina to the extent provided in G.S. 1-72.2(a) unless waived pursuant to this subsection. Additionally, in such cases, the General Assembly through the Speaker of the House of Representatives and President Pro Tempore of the Senate jointly shall possess final decision-making authority with respect to the defense of the challenged act of the General Assembly or provision of the North Carolina Constitution. In any such action, the General Assembly, through the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, may waive such representation and decline to participate in the action by written notice to the Attorney General.

General Assembly Counsel Shall Be Lead Counsel. — In those instances when the General Assembly employs counsel in addition to or other than the Attorney General, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate may jointly designate the counsel employed by the General Assembly as lead counsel in the defense of the challenged act of the General Assembly or provision of the North Carolina Constitution. The lead counsel so designated shall possess final decision-making authority with respect to the representation, counsel, or service for the General Assembly. Other counsel for the General Assembly shall, consistent with the Rules of Professional Conduct, cooperate with such designated lead counsel.

The rights provided by this section shall be supplemental to those provided by any other provision of law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the participation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in any action challenging the validity of a North Carolina statute or provision of the North Carolina Constitution under State or federal law, as a party or otherwise, shall not constitute a waiver of legislative immunity or legislative privilege of any individual legislator or legislative officer or staff of the General Assembly.

History.

2006-201, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 22.5; 2014-100, s. 17.3A(a); 2017-57, s. 6.7(g), (l).

§ 120-33.
Duties of enrolling clerk.

All bills passed by the General Assembly shall be enrolled for ratification under the supervision of the enrolling clerk.

Prior to enrolling any bill, the enrolling clerk shall substitute the corresponding Arabic numeral(s) for any date or section number of the General Statutes or of any act of the General Assembly which is written in words. The enrolled bill shall have the word “RATIFIED” following the bill number.

All bills shall be typewritten and carefully proofread before enrollment.

Upon ratification of an act or joint resolution, the enrolling clerk shall present one true ratified copy:

To the Governor of any act except acts not required to be presented to the Governor under Article II, Section 22 of the Constitution of North Carolina; and

To the Secretary of State of:

Acts not required to be presented to the Governor under Article II, Section 22 of the Constitution of North Carolina; and

Joint resolutions.In the case of any bill presented to the Governor, the enrolling clerk shall write upon the bill the time and date presented to the Governor.

(d1)

The enrolling clerk shall present to the Secretary of State one true ratified copy of:

(1)

Any bill which has become law with the approval of the Governor as provided by G.S. 120-29.1(a);

(2)

Any bill which has become law without the approval of the Governor as provided by G.S. 120-29.1(b); and

Any bill which has become law notwithstanding the objections of the Governor, as provided by G.S. 120-29.1(c).

(d2)

No bill required to be presented to the Governor under Article II, Section 22 of the Constitution of North Carolina shall be so presented until the next business day after the bill was ratified, unless expressly ordered by that house where such bill was ordered enrolled. For the purpose of this section, a business day is a weekday other than one on which there is both a State employee holiday and neither house is in session. No bill required to be presented to the Governor under Article II, Section 22 of the North Carolina Constitution shall be recalled from the Enrolling Clerk or Governor after it has been ratified but before it has been acted upon by the Governor except by joint resolution.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 20, s. 1, effective January 1, 1997, contingent on approval of constitutional amendments.

The enrolling clerk upon completion of duties after each session shall deposit the original bills and resolutions enrolled for ratification with the Secretary of State.

History.

1969, c. 1184, s. 3; 1995, c. 20, s. 1; 1997-1, s. 1.